Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska53-210
Retaliatory action, defined.

Retaliatory action shall include, but not be limited to, the refusal to continue an agreement or a material reduction in the quality of service or quantity of products available to a wholesaler under an agreement, which refusal or reduction is not made in good faith.

Laws 1989, LB 371, § 10.